Connecticut, session 2026, HB05553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 9-153a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 The form of absentee ballot application provided by any federal
5 department or agency, referred to in section 9-140, may be used only by
6 a person in any one of the following categories who is eligible to vote
7 and who expects to be unable to appear at his proper polling place for
8 any reason specified in section 9-135: (1) Members of the armed forces
9 and their spouses and dependents, (2) [the spouses and dependents of
10 such members, (3)] members of religious groups or welfare agencies
11 assisting members of the armed forces, who are officially attached to
12 and serving with the armed forces, and their spouses and dependents,
13 [(4)] (3) civilian employees of the United States in all categories serving
HB5553 / File No. 526 1

HB5553 File No. 526
14 outside the territorial limits of the several states of the United States and
15 the District of Columbia and their spouses and dependents when
16 residing with or accompanying them, whether or not the employee is
17 subject to the civil service laws and the Federal Classification Act of
18 1949, and whether or not paid from funds appropriated by the Congress,
19 [(5)] (4) citizens of the United States temporarily residing outside of the
20 territorial limits of the several states of the United States and the District
21 of Columbia, and [(6)] (5) overseas citizens qualified to vote under the
22 Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 100 Stat. 924, 42
23 USC 1973ff et seq., as amended from time to time. Any such person may
24 apply for an absentee ballot in the manner provided in section 9-140,
25 either on the form prescribed by the Secretary of the State under section
26 9-140 [,] or on the application form provided by any federal department
27 or agency. [hereinbefore referred to.]
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 9-153a
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5553 / File No. 526 2

HB5553 File No. 526
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes minor and technical changes to the existing absentee
voting statute resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5553 / File No. 526 3

HB5553 File No. 526
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5553
AN ACT CONCERNING MINOR AND TECHNICAL CHANGES TO AN
ABSENTEE VOTING STATUTE.